Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.620

Agreements for research work by private nonprofit corporations at universities—Authority.

The boards of regents of the state universities are hereby empowered to enter into agreements with corporations organized under *chapters 24.08, 24.16 or 24.20 RCW, whereby such corporations may be permitted to conduct on university property devoted mainly to medical, educational or research activities, under such conditions as the boards of regents shall prescribe, any educational, hospital, research or related activity which the boards of regents shall find will further the objects of the university.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.620. Prior: 1949 c 152 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4543-30. Formerly RCW 28.76.370.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapters 24.08 and 24.16 RCW were repealed by 1967 c 235; but see chapter 24.03A RCW, the Washington nonprofit corporation act.